Washington statutes.
RCW 39.26.285

Purchases of goods and services from nonprofit agencies for the blind.

(1) All contracts entered into and purchases made under this chapter are subject to the requirements established under RCW 19.06.020.

(2) This section is not intended to create an entitlement to an individual or class of individuals.

[ 2016 c 40 s 1.]

NOTES:

Construction—2016 c 40: "Nothing in this act requires the department of enterprise services or any other public agency to breach an existing contract or dispose of stock that has been ordered or is in the possession of the department or other agency as of June 9, 2016." [ 2016 c 40 s 3.]